Utah statutes.
78B-14-603.   Effect of registration for enforcement.

(1)  A support order or income-withholding order issued in another state is registered when the order is filed in the registering tribunal of this state.

(2)  A registered order issued in another state is enforceable in the same manner and is subject to the same procedures as an order issued by a tribunal of this state.

(3)  Except as otherwise provided in this part, a tribunal of this state shall recognize and enforce, but may not modify, a registered order if the issuing tribunal had jurisdiction.

